Washington statutes.
RCW 24.12.051

Notice of annual report requirement—Rules.

The secretary of state shall send to each corporation sole a notice in accordance with RCW 23.95.255 that its annual report must be filed as required by this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9114; 2011 c 183 s 7; 2009 c 437 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.